Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 20 Family Violence

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 308, appropriates $200,000 from the general fund to the attorney general for contracting for the provision of a legal assistance clinic in Laramie, Wyoming for victims of domestic violence or sexual assault for the period beginning July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006. Should federal funding become available for this purpose, any unexpended general fund appropriations are to revert to the general fund upon receipt of federal funds.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of statutes mandating consideration of, or creating presumptions regarding, domestic violence in awarding custody of children, 51 ALR5th 241.

§ 7-20-101.
Definition of “peace officer”.

As used in this chapter “peace officer” has the meaning specified in W.S.

7-2-101

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 140, § 1.

§ 7-20-102.
Arrests without warrant.

In addition to arrests specified in W.S.

7-2-102

, any peace officer who has probable cause to believe that a violation of W.S. 6-2-510(a) or 6-2-511(a) has taken place within the preceding twenty-four (24) hours or is taking place or that a violation of W.S. 6-2-502(a) or 6-2-504(a) or (b) has taken place within the preceding twenty-four (24) hours or is taking place and that the person who committed or is committing the violation is a household member as defined by W.S. 35-21-102(a)(iv), may arrest the violator without a warrant for that violation, regardless of whether the violation was committed in the presence of the peace officer.

A peace officer, without a warrant, may arrest and take into custody a person if:

An order of protection has been issued by a circuit or district court as authorized by W.S.

35-21-104

or

35-21-105

stating on its face the period of time for which the order is valid and specifically restraining or enjoining a household member, as defined by W.S. 35-21-102(a)(iv), from entering onto premises, from physical abuse, threats of personal abuse or acts which unreasonably restrain the personal liberty of any household member, or from abducting, removing or concealing any child in the custody of another household member or from transferring, concealing, encumbering or otherwise disposing of petitioner’s property or the joint property of the parties;

A true copy and proof of service of the order has been filed with the sheriff’s office having jurisdiction of the area in which the moving party resides;

The person named in the order has received notice of the injunctive order;

The person named in the order is acting in violation of the order or the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person violated the order within the preceding twenty-four (24) hours; and

The order states on its face that a violation of its terms subjects the person to a criminal penalty pursuant to W.S.

6-4-404

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 140, § 1; 1988, ch. 86, § 2; 1996, ch. 91, § 1; 1997, ch. 115, § 1; 2009, ch. 124, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 202; 2014 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to arrests without warrant generally, see §

7-2-102

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “through (g)” for “or (f)” in (a).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b)(i), substituted “issued by a circuit” for “issued by a county.”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “6-2-510(a) or 6-2-511(a) has taken place within the preceding twenty-four (24) hours or is taking place or that a violation of W.S.” for “6-2-501(a), (b), (e) through (g).”

§ 7-20-103.
Appearance in court; hearing; probation.

Any person arrested pursuant to W.S.

7-20-102

shall be brought before the court having jurisdiction in the cause without unnecessary delay. At the initial appearance under this section the court shall:

Set a time for a hearing on the alleged violation of the order of protection within seventy-two (72) hours after the person is initially brought before the court under this subsection;

Set a reasonable bond pending the hearing;

If the arrest is pursuant to W.S.

7-20-102

(b), notify the party who procured the order of protection and direct that party to appear at the hearing and give evidence on the alleged violation; and

If the defendant is found guilty of an offense referred to in W.S. 7-20-102(a) and 35-21-106(c) and if probation is otherwise available for the offense, the court, without entering a judgment of guilt and with the concurrence of the prosecutor and consent of the defendant, may defer further proceedings and place the defendant on probation as provided in this paragraph. The terms and conditions of probation shall include those necessary to provide for the protection of the alleged victim and other specifically designated persons and additional conditions and requirements which the court deems appropriate, including any counseling or diversionary programs available to the defendant. On violation of a term or condition of probation, the court may enter an adjudication of guilt and proceed as otherwise provided for revocation of probation. On fulfillment of the terms and conditions of probation, the court shall discharge the defendant and dismiss the proceedings against the defendant. This subsection does not apply in any case in which the defendant has previously been found guilty of an offense referred to in W.S. 7-20-102(a) and 35-21-106(c), or in which charges under this section have previously been dismissed in accordance with this subsection.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 140, § 1; 1988, ch. 86, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to probation and parole generally, see §

7-13-401

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 7-20-104.
Notice to victim of services and legal rights and remedies.

At the time of arrest under W.S.

7-20-102

or as soon thereafter as is practicable, the peace officer shall advise the victim of the availability of a program that provides services to victims of battering in the community and give the victim notice of the legal rights and remedies available. The notice shall include furnishing the victim a copy of the following statement:

“IF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you can ask the district attorney to file a criminal complaint. You also have the right to go to the circuit or district court and file a petition requesting any of the following orders for relief: (a) An order restraining your attacker from abusing you; (b) An order directing your attacker to leave your household; (c) An order preventing your attacker from entering your residence, school, business or place of employment; (d) An order awarding you or the other parent custody of or visitation with a minor child or children; (e) An order restraining your attacker from molesting or interfering with minor children in your custody; (f) An order directing the party not granted custody to pay support for minor children, or for support of the other party if that party has a legal obligation to do so. You also have the right to sue for losses suffered as a result of the abuse, including medical and moving expenses, loss of earnings or support and other out-of-pocket expenses for injuries sustained and damage to your property. This can be done without an attorney in small claims court if the total amount claimed is under $ (Officer to insert current jurisdictional limit of small claims court). 1. Name, address and phone number of local family violence program. 2. Name, address and phone number of district attorney's office.”

Click to view

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 140, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 202.

Cross references. —

As to procedure for small claims, see §

1-21-201

et seq.

As to district courts, see chapter 3 of title 5.

As to district attorneys, see §

9-1-801

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “circuit or district court” for “county or district court.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of statutes mandating consideration of, or creating presumptions regarding, domestic violence in awarding custody of children, 51 ALR5th 241.

Validity, construction, and application of state constitutional or statutory victims' bill of rights, 91 ALR5th 343.

§ 7-20-105.
Peace officer education and training.

Law enforcement agencies and the Wyoming law enforcement academy shall provide peace officers with a uniform education and training program approved by the peace officer standards and training commission designed to inform the officers of the problems of family and household abuse, procedures to deal with these problems, the provisions of this chapter and the services and facilities available to abused family and household members. The amount and degree of peace officer training shall include the following:

Officers who are currently employed by a law enforcement agency and have already completed and been certified through a state basic skills course shall be provided eight (8) hours of training through the local law enforcement agency at which the officer is employed. The law enforcement agency may contact the family violence program in the county to assist in designing and implementing this training;

Officers who have not yet completed and been certified through the Wyoming state basic skills course shall be provided twelve (12) hours of training as part of the basic skills course at the Wyoming law enforcement academy. The department of health may be contacted to assist in designing and implementing this training.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 140, § 1; 1988, ch. 86, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming law enforcement academy, see §

9-1-632

.

As to peace officer standards and training commission, see §

9-1-702

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 7-20-106.
Civil or criminal liability of peace officer.

A peace officer making an arrest pursuant to this chapter is not civilly or criminally liable for that arrest if the officer acts upon probable cause and without malice.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 140, § 1.

§ 7-20-107.
Identification codes; reports.

The Wyoming division of criminal investigation within the office of the attorney general shall develop and each law enforcement agency shall use a domestic violence identification code or codes by January 1, 1988. In all incidents of domestic violence, a report shall be written and shall be thus identified on the face of the report as a domestic violence incident.

The division of criminal investigation shall compile a quarterly and annual statistical report which shall include the number of reported incidents of domestic abuse for each county and for the state as a whole, the types of crime involved in the domestic abuse, the days of the week and hours of the day the incidents occurred and the final disposition of each reported incident. The statistical reports shall not include the names of any of the persons involved in an incident of domestic abuse or any information which would serve to identify such persons as individuals. Copies of the quarterly and annual statistical reports shall be published in the “Uniform Crime Reporting, Crime in Wyoming” publication and shall be made available to the public upon request.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 140, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to division of criminal investigation, see §

9-1-611

.